Washington statutes.
RCW 44.73.015

Legislative gift center—Selling wine for off-premises consumption—Collection and remittance of all applicable state and local taxes—Consultation with the Washington wine commission.

(1) The legislative gift center is authorized to sell at retail for off-premises consumption wine produced in Washington by a licensed domestic winery. Wine sold by the legislative gift center must: (a) Be sold to individuals twenty-one years of age or older; (b) be sold for personal use and not for resale; and (c) have been purchased from a licensed wine distributor or from a manufacturer authorized to distribute wine of its own production.

(2) The legislative gift center must collect and remit to the department of revenue all applicable state and local taxes on sales of wine.

(3) The legislative gift center must consult with the Washington wine commission to select which Washington wines will be sold. The Washington wine commission must give consideration to award winning wines in assisting the gift center.

[ 2009 c 228 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 228: See note following RCW 66.12.195.